Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2,142
Right-to-list home sale agreements; prohibited acts; void and unenforceable, when; recordation, effect.

(1) No person shall present for recording, cause to be presented for recording, or record in the office of the register of deeds or county clerk any (a) right-to-list home sale agreement as defined in section 81-885.01 or (b) lien or encumbrance resulting from such right-to-list home sale agreement.

(2) Any right-to-list home sale agreement as defined in section 81-885.01 or lien or encumbrance resulting from such right-to-list home sale agreement that is executed, modified, or extended after April 16, 2024, is void and unenforceable.

(3) If a right-to-list home sale agreement as defined in section 81-885.01 is recorded in this state, it shall not provide actual or constructive notice of such agreement against an otherwise bona fide purchaser or creditor.

(4) Any assignment or transfer of the right to provide any service under a real estate service agreement recorded prior to April 16, 2024, that would otherwise be in violation of this section is void and unenforceable without a written notice provided to and a written agreement by each party to such service agreement.

Laws 2024, LB1073, § 28.